District of Columbia statutes.
20-711

Inventory; general.

(a)

Subject to the provisions of section 20-715, a personal representative shall, within 3 months of appointment, prepare a verified inventory of property owned by the decedent at the time of his death. The inventory shall list each item of property, describe each item of property in reasonable detail, indicate the fair market value of each item of property on the date of the decedent’s death, and indicate the type and amount of the encumbrances if any, for each item of property. The personal representative shall include the following items in the inventory of property:

(1)

real property;

(2)

tangible personal property, excluding (A) wearing apparel, other than furs and jewelry, and (B) food for consumption by the family, and (C) family pictures, and (D) family Bibles;

(3)

corporate stocks;

(4)

debts owed to the decedent, including bonds and notes;

(5)

bank accounts, building association shares, savings and loan association accounts, and money;

(6)

debts owed to the decedent by the personal representative; and

(7)

any other interest in property, tangible or intangible, that passes by the terms of a valid will or the law of intestate succession.

(b)

If the administration is supervised as provided in section 20-401 et seq., and except as provided in section 20-731, the personal representative shall file with the Court the verified inventory with a certificate that there has been mailed or delivered to all interested persons, within the previous 15 days, a copy of the inventory with a notice that the inventory will be filed on or before a stated date. If the administration is not supervised, section 20-713.01 controls.

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(hh), 42 DCR 63
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 13(b), 45 DCR 745

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-712, § 20-713, § 20-731, and § 20-733.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-711.